Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Chapter 8. Offenses Concerning Highways.

§ 33.2-800.
Definition.

As used in this chapter,
“highway”
means a state or county highway.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-278; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-344; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-801.
Cutting or damaging trees; damaging bridges; damaging markers; obstructing highways; penalty.

Any person is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor who:

Cuts or damages a tree within 50 feet of a highway so as to render it liable to fall and leaves it standing;

Knowingly and willfully, without lawful authority, breaks down, destroys, or damages any bridge or log placed across a stream for the accommodation of pedestrians;

Obstructs any highway or any ditch made for the purpose of draining the highway;

Willfully or maliciously displaces, removes, destroys, or damages any highway sign or historical marker or any inscription thereon that is lawfully within a highway; or

Puts or casts into any public highway any glass, bottles, glassware, crockery, porcelain or pieces thereof, caltrops or any pieces of iron or hard or sharp metal, or any nails, tacks, or sharp-pointed instruments of any kind, likely in their nature to cut or puncture any tire of any vehicle or injure any animal traveling thereon. This subdivision shall not apply to the use of any tire deflation device by a law-enforcement officer while in the discharge of his official duties, provided the device was approved for use by the Division of Purchase and Supply.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-279; 1956, c. 676; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-345; 1972, c. 65; 1980, c. 141; 1981, c. 19; 1988, c. 79; 1989, c. 727; 1997, c. 136; 2014, c. 805.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

As to refusing to pay toll, see § 46.2-819.

§ 33.2-802.
Dumping trash; penalty.

It is unlawful for any person to dump or otherwise dispose of trash, garbage, refuse, litter, a companion animal as defined in §

3.2-6500

for the purpose of disposal, or other unsightly matter on (i) public property, including a public highway, right-of-way, or property adjacent to such highway or right-of-way, or (ii) private property without the written consent of the owner or his agent.

If a person is arrested for a violation of this section and the matter alleged to have been illegally dumped or disposed of has been ejected from a motor vehicle or transported to the disposal site in a motor vehicle, the arresting officer may comply with the provisions of § 46.2-936 in making an arrest.If a violation of this section has been observed by any person and the matter illegally dumped or disposed of has been ejected or removed from a motor vehicle, the owner or operator of the motor vehicle shall be presumed to be the person ejecting or disposing of the matter. However, such presumption shall be rebuttable by competent evidence.

Any person convicted of a violation of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by confinement in jail for not more than 12 months and a fine of not less than $500 or more than $2,500, either or both. In lieu of the imposition of confinement in jail, the court may order the defendant to perform a mandatory minimum of 10 hours of community service in litter abatement activities.

The governing body of any locality may adopt ordinances not in conflict with the provisions of this section and may repeal or amend such ordinances.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the lawful disposal of such matter in landfills.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-279.1; 1950, p. 453; 1970, c. 264, § 33.1-346; 1972, c. 65; 1976, c. 773; 1978, c. 226; 1981, c. 340; 1988, c. 805; 1995, c. 657; 2000, c. 20; 2003, cc. 113, 787; 2013, c. 156; 2014, c. 805; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 175.

Cross references.

As to penalties for littering in state parks, see § 10.1-200.2.

As to release of privileged information by Department of Motor Vehicles, see § 46.2-208.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 175, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, substituted “It is unlawful” for “It shall be unlawful” and inserted the clause (i) and (ii) designations; in subsection B, substituted “If a person” for “When any person” in the first paragraph, and substituted “If a violation of” for “When a violation of the provisions of” in the second paragraph; in subsection C, substituted “$500” for “$250”; and substituted “body of any locality” for “bodies of localities” in subsection D.

§ 33.2-803.
Dump creating fire hazard to public bridge; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to establish or maintain a public or private dump containing flammable articles within 500 feet of any public bridge constructed wholly or partly of wood so as to create a fire hazard to such bridge. Any person violating this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Each day of operation in violation of this section shall constitute a separate offense. An offense in violation of this section may be enjoined in the manner provided by law for the abatement of public nuisances.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-279.2; 1958, c. 91; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-347; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-804.
Junkyards; penalty.

For the purpose of promoting the public safety, health, welfare, convenience, and enjoyment of public travel, protecting the public investment in public highways, and preserving and enhancing the scenic beauty of lands bordering public highways, it is hereby declared to be in the public interest to regulate and restrict the establishment, operation, and maintenance of junkyards in areas adjacent to the highways within the Commonwealth.

As used in this section:“Automobile graveyard” means any lot or place that is exposed to the weather and upon which more than five motor vehicles of any kind that are incapable of being operated and which it would not be economically practical to make operative are placed, located, or found. The movement or rearrangement of vehicles within an existing lot or facility does not render this definition inapplicable. The provisions established by this subsection shall begin with the first day that the vehicle is placed on the subject property.“Federal-aid primary highway” means any highway within that portion of the primary state highway system as established and maintained under Article 2 (§

33.2-310

et seq.) of Chapter 3, including extensions of such system within municipalities that have been approved by the U.S. Secretary of Commerce pursuant to 23 U.S.C. § 103(b).“Junk” means old or scrap copper, brass, rope, rags, batteries, paper, trash, rubber, debris, or waste; junked, dismantled, or wrecked automobiles or parts thereof; and old or scrap iron, steel, or other ferrous or nonferrous material.“Junkyard” means an establishment or place of business that is maintained, operated, or used for storing, keeping, buying, or selling junk or for the maintenance or operation of an automobile graveyard. “Junkyard” includes garbage dumps and sanitary landfills.“National Highway System” means the federal-aid highway system referenced in 23 U.S.C. § 103 and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, which includes those highways that are designated as such by congressional action or designation by the U.S. Secretary of Transportation. Prior to congressional approval or designation by the U.S. Secretary of Transportation, highways classified as National System of Interstate and Defense Highways, Dwight D. Eisenhower National System of Interstate and Defense Highways, Interstate System, or federal-aid primary highways as that system existed on June 1, 1991, shall be considered as the National Highway System.“Primary highway” means any highway within the primary state highway system as established and maintained under Article 2 (§

33.2-310

et seq.) of Chapter 3, including extensions of such system within municipalities.“Visible” means capable of being seen without visual aid by a person of normal visual acuity.

No junkyard shall be established any portion of which is within 1,000 feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of any National Highway System highway or primary highway or within 500 feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of any other highway or city street, except the following:

Junkyards that are screened by natural objects, plantings, fences, or other appropriate means so as not to be visible from the main-traveled way of the highway or city street or otherwise removed from sight.

Junkyards that are located in areas that are zoned for industrial use under authority of state law or in unzoned industrial areas as determined by the Board.

Junkyards that are not visible from the main-traveled way of the highway or city street.

Any junkyard lawfully in existence on April 4, 1968, that is within 1,000 feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way and visible from the main-traveled way of any interstate or federal-aid primary highway, and not located within an industrial area, shall be screened, if feasible, by the Commissioner of Highways at locations on the highway right-of-way or in areas acquired for such purposes outside the right-of-way, so as not to be visible from the main-traveled way of such highways.Any junkyard lawfully in existence on April 4, 1968, that is within 1,000 feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of any other primary highway or within 500 feet of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of any other highway and visible from the main-traveled way of such highway, and not located within an industrial area, may be screened by the Commissioner of Highways in the same manner as junkyards adjacent to National Highway System highways.The Commissioner of Highways is authorized to acquire by purchase, gift, or the power of eminent domain such lands or interests in lands as may be necessary to provide adequate screening of such junkyards.

When the Commissioner of Highways determines that the topography of the land adjoining a National Highway System highway will not permit adequate screening of such junkyards or the screening of such junkyards would not be economically feasible, the Commissioner of Highways shall have the authority to acquire by gift, purchase, or the power of eminent domain such interests in lands as may be necessary to secure the relocation, removal, or disposal of the junkyards and to pay for the costs of their relocation, removal, or disposal. When the Commissioner of Highways determines that the topography of the land adjoining any other highway will not permit adequate screening or such would not be feasible, the Commissioner of Highways may exercise the same authority to relocate such junkyards as is vested in him in regard to National Highway System highways.

Any junkyard that comes into existence after April 4, 1968, and that cannot be made to conform to this section is declared to be a public and private nuisance and may be forthwith removed, obliterated, or abated by the Commissioner of Highways or his representatives. The Commissioner of Highways may collect the cost of such removal, obliteration, or abatement from the person owning or operating the junkyard.

The Board is authorized to enter into agreements with the United States as provided in 23 U.S.C. § 136 with respect to control of junkyards.

The Commissioner of Highways shall not be required to expend any funds for screening or relocation under this section unless and until federal-aid matching funds are made available for this purpose.

Any person violating any provision of this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-279.3; 1958, c. 552; 1962, c. 8; 1966, c. 485; 1968, c. 240; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-348; 1973, c. 328; 2005, c. 291; 2013, c. 127; 2014, c. 805.

Cross references.

As to local ordinances taxing and regulating “automobile graveyards” and “junkyards,” see §

15.2-903

.